Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 4.076, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties. The advisory council must: (1) advise the governor and heads of state departments and agencies on policies, programs, and services affecting traffic safety; (2) advise the appropriate representatives of state departments on the activities of the Toward Zero Deaths program, including but not limited to educating the public about traffic safety; (3) encourage state departments and other agencies to conduct needed research in the field of traffic safety; (4) review recommendations of the subcommittees and working groups; (5) review and comment on the development and implementation of state and local traffic safety plans; (6) advise the commissioner of public safety on grant agreements for projects under subdivision 6, paragraph (b); deleted text begin anddeleted text end (7) make recommendations on safe road zone safety measures under section 169.065deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (8) make recommendations on requirements for the community-based pedestrian safety program under section 174.43; and new text end new text begin (9) develop a collection of safety design solutions that provide roadway engineering standards or guidance for common traffic safety scenarios or contexts involving pedestrians for use in conjunction with the community-based pedestrian safety program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [174.43] COMMUNITY-BASED PEDESTRIAN SAFETY PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Appropriate road authority" means the governing body of the statutory or home rule charter city, county, or town with jurisdiction over the highway for which a traffic safety project is under development. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (d) "Program" means the community-based pedestrian safety program established in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish a community-based pedestrian safety program for roadway improvements to increase pedestrian and traffic safety in corridors identified by local community members. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) Eligible applicants and recipients of financial assistance under this section are a political subdivision, the commissioner, or a federally recognized Indian Tribe, with jurisdiction over: (1) the project highway; or (2) for a trunk highway, the corridor where the project is located. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for funding under the program, a project must: new text end new text begin (1) have local community support, as provided in paragraph (c); and new text end new text begin (2) substantially use a safety design solution developed by the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety under section 4.076, subdivision 4, clause (9). new text end new text begin (c) Local community support is demonstrated by a petition signed by at least ....... percent of the residents of: (1) the political subdivision of the appropriate road authority; or (2) for a trunk highway project, a political subdivision with jurisdiction over the corridor where the project is located. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish program requirements in consultation with the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety, including but not limited to solicitation procedures; application requirements; eligibility, subject to the requirements in subdivision 3; a process for award of financial assistance; and procedures for payments. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must make reasonable efforts to publicize each application solicitation among all eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may provide grants or other financial assistance for a project. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must not expend more than one percent of available money in a fiscal year under this section on program administration. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Use of money. new text end new text begin Financial assistance under the program is available for capital improvements to a highway segment that are primarily designed to increase pedestrian and traffic safety, including but not limited to pedestrian and nonmotorized transportation facilities and crossings. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Public information. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish information regarding the program on the department's website. The information must include: new text end new text begin (1) a description of program implementation and requirements; new text end new text begin (2) identification of projects reviewed and selected under the program; and new text end new text begin (3) for each project selected, an overview that includes a brief project description and information on expenditures. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; COMMUNITY-BASED PEDESTRIAN SAFETY PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the community-based pedestrian safety program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.43. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for development of safety design solutions by the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety under Minnesota Statutes, section 4.076, subdivision 4, clause (9). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end